Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,160
Foreign corporation; denial of reinstatement; appeal.

(a) The Secretary of State, upon denying a foreign corporation's application for reinstatement following revocation of its certificate of authority, shall serve the foreign corporation under section 21-19,155 with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(b) The foreign corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the district court of Lancaster County within thirty days after the service of the notice of denial is perfected under section 21-19,155. The foreign corporation appeals by petitioning the district court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State's certificate of revocation, the foreign corporation's application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State's notice of denial.

(c) The district court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the certificate of authority or may take any other action it considers appropriate.

(d) The district court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 160.